test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-ialaan_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - iäˊláán: # 1B
    iäˊláán+N+Sg+Nom: iäˊláán
    iäˊláán+N+Sg+Gen: iäˊláán
    iäˊláán+N+Sg+Acc: iäˊláán
    iäˊláán+N+Sg+Ill: iäˊlánân
    iäˊláán+N+Sg+Loc: iäˊlánist
    iäˊláán+N+Sg+Com: iäˊlánáin
    iäˊláán+N+Sg+Abe: iäˊláánttáá
    iäˊláán+N+Ess:    iäˊlánin
    iäˊláán+N+Par:    iäˊlánid
    iäˊláán+N+Pl+Nom: iäˊláneh
    iäˊláán+N+Pl+Gen: iäˊlánij
    iäˊláán+N+Pl+Acc: iäˊlánijd
    iäˊláán+N+Pl+Ill: iäˊlánid
    iäˊláán+N+Pl+Loc: iäˊlánjin
    iäˊláán+N+Pl+Com: iäˊlánijguin
    iäˊláán+N+Pl+Abe: iäˊlánijttáá
